Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the from any monies
not otherwise appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the
State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of
Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to effectively implement the Oklahoma Quality Events
Incentive Act by making payments in order to obtain contractual
commitments for eligible events.

Req. No. 16177 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4312 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Office of the Governor to be designated the "Oklahoma
Special Events Trust Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund,
not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all
monies received by the Office of the Governor from such sources as
may be provided by law. All monies accruing to the credit of said
fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Office of the Governor for the purpose of fully implementing the
provisions of the Oklahoma Quality Events Incentive Act.
Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by
the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with
the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16177 MAH 02/11/26

Req. No. 16177 Page 2